Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3084.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16B.04, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Powers and duties, generally. Subject to other provisions of this chapter, the commissioner is authorized to: (1) supervise, control, review, and approve all state contracts and purchasing; (2) provide agencies with supplies and equipment; (3) investigate and study the management and organization of agencies, and reorganize them when necessary to ensure their effective and efficient operation; (4) manage and control state property, real and personal; (5) maintain and operate all state buildings, as described in section 16B.24, subdivision 1; (6) supervise, control, review, and approve all capital improvements to state buildings and the Capitol building and grounds; (7) provide central mail facilities; (8) oversee publication of official documents and provide for their sale; (9) manage and operatenew text begin , subject to section 16B.58, subdivision 10,new text end parking facilities for state employees and an enterprise fleet for travel on state business; (10) provide rental space within the Capitol complex for a private day care center for children of state employees. The commissioner shall contract for services as provided in this chapter; (11) settle state employee workers' compensation claims; (12) purchase, accept, transfer, warehouse, sell, distribute, or dispose of surplus property in accordance with state and federal rules and regulations. The commissioner may charge a fee to cover any expenses incurred in connection with any of these acts; and (13) provide and manage a central distribution center for federal and state surplus personal property, as defined in section 16B.2975, and may provide and manage a warehouse facility. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16B.58, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Powers and duties of commissioner. No person may park a motor vehicle, either privately or publicly owned, upon any parking lot or facility owned or operated by the state except as authorized by this section. The commissioner shall operate and supervise all state parking lots and facilities associated with buildings described in section 16B.24, subdivision 1, or when the commissioner considers it advisable and practicable, any other parking lots or facilities owned or rented by the state for the use of a state agency or state employees. The commissioner may also provide employee shuttle service and promote alternative transportation modes, including initiatives to increase the number of multi-occupancy vehicles.new text begin Except as provided in subdivision 10,new text end the commissioner may fix and collect rents, charges, or fees in connection with and for the use of any state parking lot or facility within the cities of St. Paul and Minneapolis except for any state lot or facility the control of which is vested by law in a state agency other than the Department of Administration. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16B.58, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Free parking for state employees. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must not charge a state employee to park at any parking lot or facility owned, rented, or operated by the state when the state employee is acting within the scope of employment or when the employee is not acting within the scope of employment but has written approval from the employee's manager or supervisor. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must provide each state employee a parking permit signifying that the employee is exempt from all rents, charges, fees, fines and other penalties, and towing or other methods of vehicle removal, disablement, or impoundment under paragraph (a), except when removal or impoundment of the employee's motor vehicle is required by the commissioner under subdivision 3. new text end